Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SMALL BUSINESS RELIEF GRANTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of employment and economic development must establish a relief program for small businesses negatively impacted by federal enforcement activity between July 1, 2025, and February 28, 2026. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Grants to operators. new text end new text begin (a) Grantees under section 2 are allowed to make subgrants to operators of privately owned permanent indoor spaces that: new text end new text begin (1) host retail spaces or food markets; new text end new text begin (2) have at least 25 tenant businesses that are primarily businesses with fewer than 20 employees; and new text end new text begin (3) have a cultural emphasis. new text end new text begin (b) Grants under this subdivision may be made for up to $250,000 per operator. Of that amount, all but $10,000 of each grant must be used for subgrants from the operator to businesses that are existing tenants of that operator. These subgrants to tenants: new text end new text begin (1) must be used primarily for maintaining the operator's existing tenants; new text end new text begin (2) require that at least 50 percent of the grant be used to forgive the existing tenant's rent; and new text end new text begin (3) are subject to the requirements under subdivisions 3 and 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligible businesses. new text end new text begin To be eligible for a grant under this section, a business must: new text end new text begin (1) have primary business operations located in the state of Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) be at least 50 percent owned by a resident of the state of Minnesota; new text end new text begin (3) do business out of a permanent physical location; new text end new text begin (4) be in good standing with the secretary of state and the Department of Revenue as of the date the grant agreement is signed; new text end new text begin (5) be able to demonstrate at least a 20 percent decline in either revenue or sales when comparing the period of July 1, 2024, through February 28, 2025, and the period of July 1, 2025, through February 28, 2026; and new text end new text begin (6) employ the equivalent of 50 full-time workers or less. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Eligible uses. new text end new text begin (a) Businesses may use grant funds for the following purposes: new text end new text begin (1) payroll and contractor payments; new text end new text begin (2) commercial rent and mortgages; new text end new text begin (3) utilities payments; new text end new text begin (4) inventory replacement; new text end new text begin (5) security upgrades; and new text end new text begin (6) working capital. new text end new text begin (b) Grant funds may not be used to refinance debt that existed before December 1, 2025. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Grant process. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of employment and economic development must develop criteria, forms, applications, and reporting requirements for use by grantees. new text end new text begin (b) Grants funded under section 2, paragraph (a), clause (1), must be awarded by lottery after applications are collected over a period of no more than ten calendar days. Grants must be awarded by October 31, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) Grants funded under section 2, paragraph (a), clause (2), must be awarded by lottery after applications are collected over a period of no more than ten calendar days. Grants must be awarded by July 31, 2026. new text end new text begin (d) Grants funded under section 2, paragraph (a), clause (3), must be awarded by lottery after applications are (1) collected over a period of no more than ten calendar days, and (2) verified to not be from businesses that already received a grant under paragraph (c). Grants must be awarded by October 31, 2026. new text end new text begin (e) The minimum grant amount for a business is $5,000 and the maximum grant amount for a business per location is $25,000. Each entity conducting a lottery may determine the amount that will be granted to successful applicants, within those limits. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By December 31, 2026, the commissioner of employment and economic development must submit a report that details the use of grant funds to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over economic development. This report must include data on the number of businesses served and any evidence of a positive impact on economic development from the grants. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SMALL BUSINESS RELIEF GRANTS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $100,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for small business relief grants under section 1. Of this amount: new text end new text begin (1) $....... is for grants to the Minnesota Initiative Foundations to make grants under section 1 in greater Minnesota. The commissioner must issue a request for proposals to select these grantees; new text end new text begin (2) $....... is for grants to nonprofit corporations that meet the criteria under section 116M.18, subdivision 2, and are current certified nonprofit partners, to make grants under section 1 in the seven-county metropolitan area, as defined under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. The commissioner must select from the approved lenders a list of those lenders that have the capacity to operate the small business relief grants program; and new text end new text begin (3) $....... is for grants to nonprofit corporations that have a history of providing technical assistance, grants, or loans to small businesses, but are not a certified nonprofit partner under Minnesota Statutes, section 116M.18, subdivision 2, to make grants under section 1 in the seven-county metropolitan area, as defined under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. The commissioner must issue a request for proposals to select these nonprofit partners. new text end new text begin This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (b) Of the amounts appropriated under paragraph (a), no more than $....... may be used for the cost of administering grants under this section. new text end new text begin (c) Of each of the amounts appropriated under paragraph (a): new text end new text begin (1) at least 30 percent must fund grants under section 1, subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (2) at least 30 percent must fund grants under section 1 to businesses that employ the equivalent of six full-time workers or less. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end